Oklahoma, session 2025, SB161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 6962, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 306, O.S.L. 2024 (36 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 6962), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6962. A. The Attorney General shall review and approve


retail pharmacy network access for all pharmacy benefits managers


(PBMs) to ensure compliance with Section 6961 of this title.


B. A PBM, or an agent of a PBM, shall not:


1. Cause or knowingly permit the use of advertisement,


promotion, solicitation, representation, proposal or offer that is


untrue, deceptive or misleading;



Req. No. 674 Page 1


2. Charge a pharmacist or pharmacy a fee related to the


adjudication of a claim including without limitation a fee for:


a. the submission of a claim,


b. enrollment or participation in a retail pharmacy


network, or


c. the development or management of claims processing


services or claims payment services related to


participation in a retail pharmacy network;


3. Reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist in the state an amount


less than the amount that the PBM reimburses a pharmacy owned by or


under common ownership with a PBM for providing the same covered


services. The reimbursement amount paid to the pharmacy shall be


equal to the reimbursement amount calculated on a per-unit basis


using the same generic product identifier or generic code number


paid to the PBM-owned or PBM-affiliated pharmacy;


4. Deny a provider the opportunity to participate in any


pharmacy network at preferred participation status if the provider


is willing to accept the terms and conditions that the PBM has


established for other providers as a condition of preferred network


participation status;


5. Deny, limit or terminate a provider’s contract based on


employment status of any employee who has an active license to


dispense, despite probation status, with the State Board of


Pharmacy;

Req. No. 674 Page 2


6. Retroactively deny or reduce reimbursement for a covered


service claim after returning a paid claim response as part of the


adjudication of the claim, unless:


a. the original claim was submitted fraudulently, or


b. to correct errors identified in an audit, so long as


the audit was conducted in compliance with Sections


356.2 and 356.3 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. Fail to make any payment due to a pharmacy or pharmacist for


covered services properly rendered in the event a PBM terminates a


provider from a pharmacy benefits manager network;


8. Conduct or practice spread pricing, as defined in Section


6960 of this title, in this state; or


9. Charge a pharmacist or pharmacy a fee related to


participation in a retail pharmacy network including, but not


limited to, the following:


a. an application fee,


b. an enrollment or participation fee,


c. a credentialing or re-credentialing fee,


d. a change of ownership fee, or


e. a fee for the development or management of claims


processing services or claims payment services.


C. The prohibitions under this section shall apply to contracts


between pharmacy benefits managers and providers for participation


in retail pharmacy networks.

Req. No. 674 Page 3


1. A PBM contract shall:


a. not restrict, directly or indirectly, any pharmacy


that dispenses a prescription drug from informing, or


penalize such pharmacy for informing, an individual of


any differential between the individual’s out-of-


pocket cost or coverage with respect to acquisition of


the drug and the amount an individual would pay to


purchase the drug directly, and


b. ensure that any entity that provides pharmacy benefits


management services under a contract with any such


health plan or health insurance coverage does not,


with respect to such plan or coverage, restrict,


directly or indirectly, a pharmacy that dispenses a


prescription drug from informing, or penalize such


pharmacy for informing, a covered individual of any


differential between the individual’s out-of-pocket


cost under the plan or coverage with respect to


acquisition of the drug and the amount an individual


would pay for acquisition of the drug without using


any health plan or health insurance coverage.


2. A pharmacy benefits manager’s contract with a provider shall


not prohibit, restrict, or limit disclosure of information or


documents to the Attorney General, law enforcement or state and


federal governmental officials investigating or examining a

Req. No. 674 Page 4


complaint or conducting a review of a pharmacy benefits manager’s


compliance with the requirements under the Patient’s Right to


Pharmacy Choice Act, the Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act, and Sections


357 through 360 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. A pharmacy benefits manager shall:


1. Establish and maintain an electronic claim inquiry


processing system using the National Council for Prescription Drug


Programs’ Programs’s current standards to communicate information to


pharmacies submitting claim inquiries;


2. Fully disclose to insurers, self-funded employers, unions or


other PBM clients the existence of the respective aggregate


prescription drug discounts, rebates received from drug


manufacturers and pharmacy audit recoupments;


3. Provide the Attorney General, insurers, self-funded employer


plans and unions unrestricted audit rights of and access to the


respective PBM pharmaceutical manufacturer and provider contracts,


plan utilization data, plan pricing data, pharmacy utilization data


and pharmacy pricing data;


4. Maintain, for no less than three (3) years, documentation of


all network development activities including, but not limited to,


contract negotiations and any denials to providers to join networks.


This documentation shall be made available to the Attorney General


upon request; and



Req. No. 674 Page 5


5. Report to the Attorney General, on a quarterly basis for


each health insurer payor, on the following information:


a. the aggregate amount of rebates received by the PBM,


b. the aggregate amount of rebates distributed to the


appropriate health insurer payor,


c. the aggregate amount of rebates passed on to the


enrollees of each health insurer payor at the point of


sale that reduced the applicable deductible,


copayment, coinsure or other cost sharing amount of


the enrollee,


d. the individual and aggregate amount paid by the health


insurer payor to the PBM for pharmacy services


itemized by pharmacy, drug product and service


provided, and


e. the individual and aggregate amount a PBM paid a


provider for pharmacy services itemized by pharmacy,


drug product and service provided; and


6. Maintain a fiduciary duty to insurers and insureds served by


the PBM.


E. Nothing in the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice Act shall


prohibit the Attorney General from requesting and obtaining detailed


data, including raw data, in response to the information provided by


a PBM in the quarterly reports required by this section. The



Req. No. 674 Page 6


Attorney General may alter the frequency of the reports required by


this section at his or her sole discretion.


F. The Attorney General may promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice Act, the


Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act, and Sections 357 through 360 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-674 CAD 12/30/2024 11:52:39 AM































Req. No. 674 Page 7